src/fst/phonology.twolc
"o/ei-Umlaut II"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 i:0 <=> e: _ Cns:+ %^EIO: ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ dreing^EIO>i
!!€ dro0ng00i

! XXX Test i dag
!"Suffix-initial vowel deletion for vowel-final stems"
!i:0 <=> _ %>: i ;

! merki>ið
! merk00ið


"æ to ø Umlaut for bræv"
æ:ø <=> _ Cns:* %^ØUML: ;



!! ### Vowel deletion rules

"Vowel deletion in front of na"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 a:0 <=> _ %^W: n ;

!"Special Dative v Deletion"
! v:0 <=> g _ ^IUML: >: i ;

!"Plural i Deletion in faðir"
! i:0 <=> :e ð _ r ^IUML: >: ;

! faðir^IUML>ar
! feð0r00ar





!! ### Verbal vowel alternation rules

"Stem vowel change in Weak Verbs"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns:+ %^WVV: ; ! WVV = Verb
 	where Vx in (e y)
 		  Vy in (a u)
 		  matched ;

!! **Tests:**
 		  
!!€ flek^WVV>t
!!€ flak00t 
!!€ flek^WVV>t
!!€ flak00t 
!!€ vel^WVV>di
!!€ val00di 


"Stem Vowel Shortening in Supine and Participle"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns:+ %^VSH:  ; !ok, men flúgv > flýg funker fremdeles ikke ...
	where Vx in ( á ó í ú )
	      Vy in ( a o i u )
		  matched ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ bít^VSHin>a
!!€ bit00n>a


! Verbal ablaut rules

! Past singular

"Past tense singular diphthongs I"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
0:Vx <=> Cns _ Vy: Cns:+ %^AB1: ;
	where Vx in ( e e e e )
	      Vy in ( í ó u ú )
!	      Vz in ( i y y y )
	matched ;

"Past tense singular diphthongs II"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vy:Vz <=> Cns :Vx _  Cns:+ %^AB1: ;
	where Vx in ( e e e e )
	      Vy in ( í ó u ú )
	      Vz in ( i y y y )
	matched ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ b0ít^AB1
!!€ beit0


"Past tense singular monophthongs"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:Vy <=> _  (Cns:+) %^AB3: ;
	where Vx in ( e ø a o á i )
	      Vy in ( a a ó a æ a )
	matched ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ gev^AB3
!!€ gav0

"Past tense plural monophthongs"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns:+ %^AB2: %>: u ;
          _ %^AB2: ;	
        where Vx in ( á í ó ú i e a ø )
    	      Vy in ( ó i u u ó ó i u )
	matched ;

!"Past tense plural monophthongs to ó"
!Vx:ó <=> _ Cns:+ %>: u ;
!	where Vx in ( i e a o á ) ;

"Past tense plural monophthongs to a"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:a <=> _ Cns:+ (%^NGKK:) %^aAB: ;
	where Vx in ( i e ø ) ;

!"Past tense plural monophthongs to u"
!Vx:u <=> _ Cns:+ %^uAB: ;
!	where Vx in ( i e ø ) ;

!"Past tense plural monophthongs to o"
!Vx:o <=> _ Cns:+ %^oAB: ;
!	where Vx in ( i e ø ) ;

"Supine u"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:u <=> _ Cns:+ %^AB4: ;
	where Vx in ( i e ø ó ú ) ;

!"Supine u"
!Vx:u <=> Cns+ _ %^AB4: %>: ;
!	where Vx in ( i e ) ;

"Supine o"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:o <=> _ Cns:+ %^AB5: ;
	where Vx in ( a i e ø ó ú ) ;

!"Supine o"
!Vx:o <=> Cns+ _ %^AB5: %>: ;
!	where Vx in ( í ó ú ø i e a ) ;

"Supine i"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:i <=> _ Cns:+ %^AB6: ;
	where Vx in ( í a e á ) ;

!"Supine i"
!Vx:i <=> Cns+ _ %^AB6: %>: ;
!	where Vx in ( í a e ) ;

"Present tense ý"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:ý <=> _ Cns:+ %^AB7: ;
	where Vx in ( ó ) ;

!"Adjective neuter after ð"
!t:0 <=> Vow Cns+ Vow ð %^EDH: %>: _ #: ;

! brekað>t
! brekað00


!! ### Adjectival Sandhi rule

"Vowel shortening in Neuter"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
ó:o <=> _ ð: %>: t ;
!ó:o <= _ :t %>: t ; ! check this one.

!! **Tests:**

!!€ góð>t
!!€ got0t
!!€ skjót>t
!!€ skjót0t


!! ## Other rules

!! ### Morphological passive rules

"u in ur Deletion in front of Pass"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 u:0 <=> %>: _ r: %^PASS:0 %>: s t #: ;

"r Deletion in front of Pass"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 r:0 <=> [i:|u:] _ %^PASS:0 %>: s t #: ;

"ð Deletion in front of Pass"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 ð:0 <=> _ %^PASS:0 %>: s t #: ;


! Remove these when the dust has settled
!"Vowel-deletion in definite article suffix"
! Vx:0 <=> _ (Dummy:) %>: (Dummy:) [ i [ n | ð ] | u m | s %>: i n s | a | u ] ;
!      where Vx in ( i a ) ;
!"Deleting initial i in definite suffix"
! i:0 <=> %>:  Vow                              %>: _ [ n u m | n s | n | ð | n i | n a | n n a r ] #: ; 
!             [ a | u | i ] r (Special:*) %>:*  %>: _ [ n [i|a] r #: ]; 
!               Vow %>:+                            _ [ n | ð | n i ] #: ;
!                                                   _ %>:+ [ a | u m ] ;
!"Deleting initial i in definite suffix after vowel, ð or g last in stem"
! i:0 <=> Vow %>: %>:                                _         n u m #: ; 
!         Vow: %>:                                   _ %>: i:0 n u m #: ; 
!         Vow: %>: i:0 %>:                           _         n u m #: ;
!         Vow: [ ð | g ] (Special:*) %>: ( i:0 ) %>: _         n u m #: ; 
!         Vow: [ ð | g ] (Special:*) %>:             _ %>:  i: n u m #: ;

! Test pairs added from an old file pair-fao.txt, seems obsolete, butt should
! be checked:
!
! aku2r%>a
! ak0r0a
! 
! lyki2l%>a
! lyk0l0a
! 
! afta2n%>a
! aft0n0a
! 
! da3g%>um
! døg0um
! 
! da3g%>i 
! deg0i
! 
! hjall%>s
! hjal00s
! 
! summa2r%>i
! sum00r0i
! 
! hjall%>ar
! hjall0ar
! 
! heyggj%>i
! heygg00i
! 
! hylj2%>ar
! hylj0ar
! 
! dømi%>ið
! dømi00ð
! 
! dømi%>um
! døm00um
